test/src/morphology/V-manzj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - манзь: # Verb 'to say' - partial paradigm
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: мадмʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ман
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ма
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: маниʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: мадиʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: маӈахаʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: маваˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: мадаˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: маˮ
     манзь+V+IV+InfImprf: мава  
     манзь+V+IV+InfPrf: маˮма  
     манзь+V+IV+PrcImprf: [мана, маня]
     манзь+V+IV+PrcPrf: мавы
     манзь+V+IV+PrcFut: маванда   
     манзь+V+IV+PrcNeg: мавдавэй
     манзь+V+IV+Ger: манзь
     манзь+V+IV+GerFin: маванзь      
     манзь+V+IV+Subord: мабˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Aud: [мамоʼ, маманоʼ]
     манзь+V+IV+Evas: мавоӈгад
     манзь+V+IV+ConNeg: манˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: мандаˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg1: [мабˮнани, мабаˮни]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg2: [мабˮнанд, мабат]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg3: [мабˮнанда, мабата] 
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu1: [мабˮнаниʼ, мабаˮниʼ]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu2: [мабˮнандиʼ, мабаˮтиʼ]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu3: [мабˮнандиʼ, мабаˮтиʼ]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl1: [мабˮнанаˮ, мабаˮнаˮ]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl2: [мабˮнандаˮ, мабатаˮ]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl3: [мабˮнандоʼ, мабатоʼ]
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: мандадмʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: мандан
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манда
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: манданиʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: мандадиʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мандахаʼ #or мандаӈгахаʼ?
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: мандаваˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: мандадаˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мандаˮ            
